hfst/verb-som-lex.txt
LEXICON ODHAN
	+Inf:odhan	FINAL ; ! odhán
	+Inf:oran	FINAL/TODO ; ! odhán

	+Ind+Past:	ODHAN/GenPast ;
	+Ind+Past:  ODHAN/GenPastRed ; ! +Red tag after
	+Neg+Past:	ODHAN/GenPastNeg ;
	
	+Ind+Pres:	ODHAN/GenPres ;
	+Ind+Pres:	ODHAN/GenPresRed ; ! +Red tag after
	+Neg+Pres:	ODHAN/GenPresNeg ;
	
	+Imp:		ODHAN/Imp ;
	
	! Barrier and @PREFIXING@ necessary for Prog.
	 :odhan{#}@PREFIXING@		Progressive ; ! imán ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.
	+Sty/TODO:oran{#}@PREFIXING@		Progressive ; ! imán ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.
	
	+Neg+Prog+Pres:odhan 			FINAL ;		! odhán
	+Neg+Prog+Past:odhanayn			FINAL ; 	! odhánaýn
	+Neg+Prog+Past:odhanaynin		FINAL ; 	! odhánaynín
	
	+Neg+Prog+Pres:oran 			FINAL ;		! odhán
	+Neg+Prog+Past:oranayn			FINAL ; 	! odhánaýn
	+Neg+Prog+Past:oranaynin		FINAL ; 	! odhánaynín
	


LEXICON ODHAN/GenPast
	  +1Sg:idhi				FINAL ;
	 +2Sg:tidhi				FINAL ;
	+3SgM:yidhi				FINAL ;
	+3SgF:tidhi				FINAL ;
	 +1Pl:nidhi				FINAL ;
	+2Pl:tidhaahdeen		FINAL ;
	+3Pl:yidhaahdeen		FINAL ;
	! Forms for southern dialect. Doing this the lazy copy/paste way.
	! People actually write these, so analyzing them with a Sty tag.
	  +1Sg:iri				FINAL/TODO ;
	 +2Sg:tiri				FINAL/TODO ;
	+3SgM:yiri				FINAL/TODO ;
	+3SgF:tiri				FINAL/TODO ;
	 +1Pl:niri				FINAL/TODO ;
	+2Pl:tiraahdeen		FINAL/TODO ;
	+3Pl:yiraahdeen		FINAL/TODO ;


LEXICON ODHAN/GenPastRed
	  +1Sg+Red:idhi			FINAL ; ! 	 idhí
	 +2Sg+Red:yidhi			FINAL ; ! 	yidhí 
	+3SgM+Red:yidhi			FINAL ; ! 	yidhí 
	+3SgF+Red:tidhi			FINAL ; ! 	tidhí 
	 +1Pl+Red:nidhi			FINAL ; ! 	nidhí 
	+2Pl+Red:yidhi			FINAL ; ! 	yidhí 
	+3Pl+Red:yidhi			FINAL ; ! 	yidhí 
	! Southern dialect
	  +1Sg+Red:iri			FINAL/TODO ; ! 	 idhí
	 +2Sg+Red:yiri			FINAL/TODO ; ! 	yidhí 
	+3SgM+Red:yiri			FINAL/TODO ; ! 	yidhí 
	+3SgF+Red:tiri			FINAL/TODO ; ! 	tidhí 
	 +1Pl+Red:niri			FINAL/TODO ; ! 	nidhí 
	+2Pl+Red:yiri			FINAL/TODO ; ! 	yidhí 
	+3Pl+Red:yiri			FINAL/TODO ; ! 	yidhí 

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPastNeg
	+Sg:odhan               FINAL ; ! odhán
	+Pl:odhanin             FINAL ; ! odhanín
	+Sg:oran               FINAL/TODO ; ! odhán
	+Pl:oranin             FINAL/TODO ; ! odhanín

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPres
	  +1Sg:idhaahdaa			FINAL ;
	 +2Sg:tidhaahdaa			FINAL ;
	+3SgM:yidhaahdaa			FINAL ;
	+3SgF:tidhaahdaa			FINAL ;
	 +1Pl:nidhaahnaa			FINAL ;
	+2Pl:tidhaahdaan		FINAL ;
	+3Pl:yidhaahdaan		FINAL ;
	
	  +1Sg:iraahdaa			FINAL/TODO ;
	 +2Sg:tiraahdaa			FINAL/TODO ;
	+3SgM:yiraahdaa			FINAL/TODO ;
	+3SgF:tiraahdaa			FINAL/TODO ;
	 +1Pl:niraahnaa			FINAL/TODO ;
	+2Pl:tiraahdaan		FINAL/TODO ;
	+3Pl:yiraahdaan		FINAL/TODO ;

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPresRed
	  +1Sg+Red:idhaahda			FINAL ; 	! 	 idhaahdá
	 +2Sg+Red:yidhaahda			FINAL ; 	! 	yidhaahdá
	+3SgM+Red:yidhaahda			FINAL ; 	! 	yidhaahdá
	+3SgF+Red:tidhaahda			FINAL ; 	! 	tidhaahdá
	 +1Pl+Red:nidhaahda			FINAL ; 	! 	nidhaahdá
	+2Pl+Red:yidhaahda			FINAL ; 	! 	yidhaahdá
	+3Pl+Red:yidhaahda			FINAL ; 	! 	yidhaahdá
	
	  +1Sg+Red:iraahda			FINAL/TODO ; 	! 	 idhaahdá
	 +2Sg+Red:yiraahda			FINAL/TODO ; 	! 	yidhaahdá
	+3SgM+Red:yiraahda			FINAL/TODO ; 	! 	yidhaahdá
	+3SgF+Red:tiraahda			FINAL/TODO ; 	! 	tidhaahdá
	 +1Pl+Red:niraahda			FINAL/TODO ; 	! 	nidhaahdá
	+2Pl+Red:yiraahda			FINAL/TODO ; 	! 	yidhaahdá
	+3Pl+Red:yiraahda			FINAL/TODO ; 	! 	yidhaahdá
	

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPresNeg
	  +1Sg:idhaahdo			FINAL ;     !  idhaahdó  
	 +2Sg:tidhaahdo			FINAL ;     ! tidhaahdó  
	+3SgM:yidhaahdo			FINAL ;     ! yidhaahdó  
	+3SgF:tidhaahdo			FINAL ;     ! tidhaahdó  
	 +1Pl:nidhaahdo			FINAL ;     ! nidhaahnó  
	+2Pl:tidhaahdaan		FINAL ;     ! tidhaahdáan
	+3Pl:yidhaahdaan		FINAL ;     ! yidhaahdáan
	
	  +1Sg:iraahdo			FINAL/TODO ;     !  idhaahdó  
	 +2Sg:tiraahdo			FINAL/TODO ;     ! tidhaahdó  
	+3SgM:yiraahdo			FINAL/TODO ;     ! yidhaahdó  
	+3SgF:tiraahdo			FINAL/TODO ;     ! tidhaahdó  
	 +1Pl:niraahdo			FINAL/TODO ;     ! nidhaahnó  
	+2Pl:tiraahdaan		FINAL/TODO ;     ! tidhaahdáan
	+3Pl:yiraahdaan		FINAL/TODO ;     ! yidhaahdáan

LEXICON ODHAN/Imp
	+Sg:dheh		FINAL ;		! dhéh
	+Pl:dhaha		FINAL ; 	! dháha
	
	+Neg+Sg:odhan	FINAL ;     ! ódhan
	+Neg+Sg:odhanin	FINAL ;     ! ódhanin
	+Neg+Pl:odhanina FINAL ; 	! odhanína
	! Unclear on whether these exist, but doing them for consistency
	+Sg:reh		FINAL/TODO ;		! dhéh
	+Pl:raha		FINAL/TODO ; 	! dháha
	
	+Neg+Sg:oran	FINAL/TODO ;     ! ódhan
	+Neg+Sg:oranin	FINAL/TODO ;     ! ódhanin
	+Neg+Pl:oranina FINAL/TODO ; 	! odhanína
